Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3921
Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be used for the operations of the commission. The Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund shall consist of money remitted pursuant to section 33-156. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission shall be funded solely from the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 108, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 65;

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB961, § 2;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 16;

Laws 2011, LB463, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB969, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB952, § 3.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.